Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Part 2

Privileged Communications

24-1-201. Married persons.

In either a civil or criminal proceeding, no married person has privilege to refuse to take the witness stand solely because that person's spouse is a party to the proceeding.

In a civil proceeding, confidential communications between married persons are privileged and inadmissible if either spouse objects. This communications privilege shall not apply to proceedings between spouses or to proceedings concerning abuse of one (1) of the spouses or abuse of a minor in the custody of or under the dominion and control of either spouse, including, but not limited to, proceedings arising under title 36, chapter 1, part 1; title 37, chapter 1, parts 1, 4 and 6; title 37, chapter 2, part 4; and title 71, chapter 6, part 1. This confidential communications privilege shall not apply to any insured's obligations under a contract of insurance in civil proceedings.

In a criminal proceeding a marital confidential communication shall be privileged if:

The communications originated in a confidence that they will not be disclosed;

The element of confidentiality is essential to the full and satisfactory maintenance of the relation between the parties;

The relation must be one which, in the opinion of the community, ought to be sedulously fostered; and

The injury to the relation by disclosure of the communications outweighs the benefit gained for the correct disposal of litigation.

Upon a finding that a marital communication is privileged, it shall be inadmissible if either spouse objects. Such communication privileges shall not apply to proceedings concerning abuse of one (1) of the spouses or abuse of a minor in the custody of or under the dominion and control of either spouse, including, but not limited to proceedings arising under title 37, chapter 1, parts 1 and 4; title 37, chapter 2, part 4; and title 71, chapter 6, part 1.

Acts 1867-1868, ch. 75, § 1; 1868-1869, ch. 7, § 1; 1869-1870, ch. 19, § 2; 1869-1870, ch. 78; 1879, ch. 200, § 1; Shan., § 5596; Code 1932, § 9777; Acts 1949, ch. 55, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9777; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-103; Acts 1995, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 831, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Attorney, as to communications, §23-3-105.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Conviction of felony, effect, §40-20-112.

Evidentiary privileges inapplicable in child sexual abuse cases, §37-1-614.

Information obtained by certified public accountants in course of employment, §62-1-116.

Witnesses entering or passing through state pursuant to summons, immunity, §40-17-209.

Rule Reference. This title is referred to in Rule 7, § 12.13, of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 703.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Agency, §§ 4, 66; 9 Tenn. Juris., Discovery § 12; 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, §§ 164, 199; 21 Tenn. Juris., Privileged Communications, §§ 5, 6; 24 Tenn. Juris., Trusts and Trustees, § 21; 24 Tenn. Juris., Usury, § 26; 24 Tenn. Juris., Vendor and Purchaser, § 9; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, §§ 11, 13, 19, 21.

Law Reviews.

A Meta-Analysis of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence (Neil P. Cohen), 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1989).

Admissibility in Tennessee of Spouses' Testimony Concerning Their Private Affairs, 3 Vand. L. Rev. 298.

Autopsy on Spousal Privilege (Donald F. Paine), 40 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 32 (2004).

Character Evidence as Affecting the Credibility of Witnesses (J.A. Osoinach), 2 Tenn. L. Rev. 165.

Distinctive Features of the Tennessee Law of Trusts (Thomas H. Malone), 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 33.

Domestic Relations — Interspousal Tort Actions for Personal Injuries — Conflict of Laws, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 1056.

Evidence — Confidential Communications Between Spouses — Admissibility of Testimony as to Conduct of Party Spouse, 3 Vand. L. Rev. 656.

Evidence — Privileged Communications Between Husband and Wife, 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 943.

Evidence — Privileged Communications in Divorce Actions: Psychiatrist-Patient and Presence of Third Parties, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 110.

Evidence — State v. Hurley: Erosion of the Marital Privilege for Confidential Communications in Tennessee, 25 U. Mem. L. Rev. 835 (1995).

Evidence — Testimony of Spouses — Inadmissible in Divorce Action For Cruelty, 2 Vand. L. Rev. 130.

Hell Hath No Fury Like a Spouse Scorned — A Focus on Tennessee's Marital Privilege for Confidential Communications, 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 57 (1989).

Husband and Wife — Confidential Communications in Divorce Actions, 20 Tenn. L. Rev. 695.

Paine on Procedure: Death of the Spousal Privilege (Donald F. Paine), 37 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 29 (2001).

Should Tennessee Bury the Dead Man Statute As Arkansas Has? (W. Dent Gitchel), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 195 (1989).

Statutory Construction — Restriction of Application of Statute to Contemporary Circumstances — Parties as “Witnesses” under Tennessee Deposition Statute, 3 Vand. L. Rev. 666.

The Marital Privilege in the Twenty-First Century, 32 U. Mem. L. Rev. 137 (2001).

24-1-202. Transactions with mentally incompetent party.

It is not lawful for any party to any action, suit, or proceeding to testify as to any transaction or conversation with, or statement by, any opposite party in interest, if such opposite party is incapacitated or disqualified to testify thereto, by reason of idiocy, lunacy, or insanity, unless called by the opposite side, and then only in the discretion of the court; provided, if a corporation be a party, this disqualification shall extend to its officers of every grade and its directors.

Acts 1879, ch. 200, § 2; Shan., § 5597; Code 1932, § 9779; Acts 1947, ch. 88, § 1; 1949, ch. 55, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 9779; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-104; Acts 2009, ch. 281, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 20.

Law Reviews.

Alienability of Future Interests in Tennessee, 5 Vand. L. Rev. 80.

Competency and Impeachment of Witnesses (Leo Bearman, Jr.), 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 89 (1989).

24-1-203. Transactions with decedent or ward — Dead man's statute.

In actions or proceedings by or against executors, administrators, or guardians, in which judgments may be rendered for or against them, neither party shall be allowed to testify against the other as to any transaction with or statement by the testator, intestate, or ward, unless called to testify thereto by the opposite party. If a corporation is a party, this disqualification shall extend to its officers of every grade and its directors.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 78, § 2; Shan., § 5598; Code 1932, § 9780; Acts 1947, ch. 88, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 9780; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-105.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 601 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 703, 704.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Advancements, § 4; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 94; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 2; 23 Tenn. Juris., Stipulations, § 2; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, §§ 11, 13, 15, 21-24.

Law Reviews.

A Comparative Study of the Witness Rules in the Proposed Federal Rules of Evidence and in Tennessee Law (Jerry J. Phillips), 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 379.

Competency and Impeachment of Witnesses (Leo Bearman, Jr.), 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 89 (1989).

Evidence — Dead Man Statute — Observation of Physical Conditions Not a “Transaction” Within Meaning of Statute, 4 Vand. L. Rev. 913.

Procedure and Evidence — 1957 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 10 Vand. L. Rev. 1144.

Procedure and Evidence — 1961 Tennessee Survey (Edmund M. Morgan), 14 Vand. L. Rev. 1353.

Should Tennessee Bury the Dead Man Statute As Arkansas Has? (W. Dent Gitchel), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 195 (1989).

The Dead Man's Statute (Donald F. Paine), 38 No. 3 Tenn. B.J. 23 (2002).

The Howland Will Case: Mutual Wills and the Dead Woman's Statute (Donald F. Paine and Dan W. Holbrook), 39 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (2003).

The Tennessee Dead Man's Statute, 49 Tenn. L. Rev. 343 (1982).

Witnesses — Dead Man's Statute in Tort Actions, 21 Tenn. L. Rev. 788.

24-1-204. Communications during crisis intervention.

As used in this section:

“Crisis intervention” means a session at which crisis response services are rendered by a critical incident stress management team member or leader during or after a crisis or disaster;

“Crisis response services” means consultation, risk assessment, referral and crisis intervention services provided by a critical incident stress management team to individuals affected by crisis or disaster;

“Critical incident stress management team member or team leader,” referred to also as “team member,” or “team leader,” means an individual specially trained to provide crisis response services as a member or leader of an organized community or local crisis response team that holds membership in a registered critical incident stress management team;

“Registered team” means a team formally registered with a recognized training agency. A recognized training agency shall include the International Critical Incident Stress Foundation, the National Organization for Victim Assistance, the American Red Cross, the Tennessee Public Safety Network and other such organizations;

“Training session” means a session providing crisis response training by a qualified trained trainer utilizing the standards established by the accrediting agencies set out in subdivision (a)(4); and

“Volunteer” means a person who serves and receives no remuneration for services except reimbursement for actual expenses.

All communications between a team member or team leader providing, and a group participant or person participating in, a crisis intervention shall be considered confidential and no such person shall be required to disclose any such communication unless otherwise required by law or rule of court.

Except as provided under subsection (d), no person, whether a team member, team leader or group participant, providing or participating in a crisis intervention shall be required to testify or divulge any information obtained solely through such crisis intervention.

The testimonial privilege established under subsection (c) shall not apply if any of the following are true:

The communication indicates the existence of a danger to the individual who receives crisis response services or to any other person or persons;

The communication indicates the existence of past or present child abuse or neglect of the individual, abuse of an adult as defined in title 71, chapter 6 or family violence as defined in title 71, chapter 6, part 2;

The communication indicates the existence of past or present acts constituting an intentional tort or crime; provided, that the applicable statute of limitation has not expired on the act indicated; or

All parties involved in the crisis intervention, including the individual or individuals who received crisis response services, expressly waive the privilege and consent to the testimony.

Acts 2009, ch. 332, § 1; 2010, ch. 618, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§24-1-204,24-1-205 (Code 1858, § 3811 (deriv. Acts 1824, ch. 13, § 1); Acts 1871, ch. 107, § 1; Shan., §§ 5594, 5599; mod. Code 1932, §§ 9776, 9781; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 24-106, 24-107), concerning parties exempt from rule for exclusion of witnesses and judges as witnesses, were repealed by Acts 1991, ch. 273, §§ 8, 9. For present law, see Tenn. R. Evid. 605, 615.

Acts 2010, ch. 618, § 2 provided that the amendment to subdivision (d)(2) shall apply to any crisis intervention testimonial privilege asserted on or after March 2, 2010.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

24-1-205. [Reserved.]

No minister of the gospel, priest of the Catholic Church, rector of the Episcopal Church, ordained rabbi, or regular minister of religion of any religious organization or denomination usually referred to as a church, over eighteen (18) years of age, shall be allowed or required in giving testimony as a witness in any litigation, to disclose any information communicated to that person in a confidential manner, properly entrusted to that person in that person's professional capacity, and necessary to enable that person to discharge the functions of such office according to the usual course of that person's practice or discipline, wherein such person so communicating such information about such person or another is seeking spiritual counsel and advice relative to and growing out of the information so imparted.

It shall be the duty of the judge of the court wherein such litigation is pending, when such testimony as prohibited in this section is offered, to determine whether or not that person possesses the qualifications which prohibit that person from testifying to the communications sought to be proven by that person.

The prohibition of this section shall not apply to cases where the communicating party, or parties, waives the right so conferred by personal appearance in open court so declaring, or by an affidavit properly sworn to by such a one or ones, before some person authorized to administer oaths, and filed with the court wherein litigation is pending.

Nothing in this section shall modify or in any way change the law relative to “hearsay testimony.”

Any minister of the gospel, priest of the Catholic Church, rector of the Episcopal Church, ordained rabbi, or any regular minister of religion of any religious organization or denomination usually referred to as a church, who violates this section, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1959, ch. 24, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 24-109 — 24-111; modified; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Code Commission Notes.

Portions of this section have been rewritten by the executive secretary to the Tennessee code commission to implement Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113, effective November 1, 1989, which requested that the executive secretary amend this section by deleting the penalty provision and inserting language to indicate violation of the section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Evidentiary privileges inapplicable in child sexual abuse cases, §37-1-614.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure — 1959 Tennessee Survey (Robert E. Kendrick), 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1131.

Toward a Unified Approach to Privileges and Relevancy (Thomas F. Guernsey), 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

Attorney General Opinions. Communications between an employee of a county sheriff's department and a volunteer clergy member, appointed by the sheriff to provide spirtual consultation, are confidential and privileged, provided the communications are made to the clergy member confidentially, in the clergy's professional capacity, according to the usual course of the clergy's practice or discipline, as established by the rules or customs of the clergy's religious organization or denomination when the employee is seeking spiritual advice or counseling; however, this privilege does not apply to any communication involving known or suspected child sexual abuse, OAG 01-009, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/25/01).

The identity of the person appointing a minister to provide spiritual consultation at a sheriff's office is irrelevant to the clergy-penitent privilege, OAG 01-009, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/25/01).

24-1-207. Communications between psychiatrist and patient.

Communications between a patient and a licensed physician when practicing as a psychiatrist in the course of and in connection with a therapeutic counseling relationship regardless of whether the therapy is individual, joint, or group, are privileged in proceedings before judicial and quasi-judicial tribunals. Neither the psychiatrist nor any member of the staff may testify or be compelled to testify as to such communications or otherwise reveal them in such proceedings without consent of the patient except:

In proceedings in which the patient raises the issue of the patient's mental or emotional condition;

In proceedings for which the psychiatrist was ordered by the tribunal to examine the patient if the patient was advised that communications to the psychiatrist would not be privileged, but testimony as to the communications is admissible only on issues involving the patient's mental or emotional condition; and

In proceedings to involuntarily hospitalize the patient under title 33, chapter 6, part 4 or title 33, chapter 6, part 5, if the psychiatrist decides that the patient is in need of care and treatment in a residential facility. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the exception is limited to disclosures necessary to establish that the patient poses a substantial likelihood of serious harm requiring involuntary hospitalization under title 33, chapter 6, part 4 or title 33, chapter 6, part 5.

When personally identifiable patient information is to be disclosed in a judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding or any other public proceeding, the authority conducting the proceeding shall take reasonable steps to prevent unnecessary exposure of such information to the public and to further this section's policy of protecting the right of privacy. Such steps may include screening of questions in prehearing conferences and in camera inspection of papers.

Privileged communications between a patient and a licensed physician when practicing as a psychiatrist in the course of and in connection with a therapeutic counseling relationship, regardless of whether the therapy is individual, joint, or group, may be disclosed without consent of the patient if:

Such patient has made an actual threat to physically harm an identifiable victim or victims; and

The treating psychiatrist makes a clinical judgment that the patient has the apparent capability to commit such an act and that it is more likely than not that in the near future the patient will carry out the threat.

The psychiatrist may disclose patient communications to the extent necessary to warn or protect any potential victim. No civil or criminal action shall be instituted, nor shall liability be imposed due to the disclosure of otherwise confidential communications by a psychiatrist pursuant to this subsection (c).

Acts 1965, ch. 157, § 1; 1972, ch. 648, § 11; T.C.A., § 24-112; Acts 1986, ch. 776, § 1; 1987, ch. 417, § 1; 1989, ch. 519, § 1; 1994, ch. 832, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 8A, 8C.

Cross-References. Communications between psychologist and patient, §63-11-213.

Communications concerning violent behavior of patients, title 33, ch. 10, part 3.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Evidentiary privileges inapplicable in child sexual abuse cases, §37-1-614.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Privileged Communications, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Camping Trips and Family Trees: Must Tennessee Physicians Warn Their Patients' Relatives of Genetic Risks? (Carol McCrehan Parker), 65 Tenn. L. Rev. 585 (1998).

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1977-1978, IV. Procedure (Joseph G. Cook), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 494.

Evidence — Jaffee v. Redmond: Establishing the “Psychotherapist-Patient Privilege” under Rule 501 of the Federal Rules of Evidence, 27 U. Mem. L. Rev. 703 (1997).

Evidence — Privileged Communications in Divorce Actions: Psychiatrist-Patient and Presence of Third Parties, 40 Tenn. L. Rev. 110.

Hospital Records as Evidence: New Rules and Old Statutes (Donald F. Paine), 26 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 33 (1990).

Medical Jurisprudence — Privileged Communications Between Physician and Patient — State Regulation and Right To Privacy, 39 Tenn. L. Rev. 515.

Obtaining medical records for mental health evaluations (David L. Raybin), 37 No. 7 Tenn. B.J. 27 (2001).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Toward a Unified Approach to Privileges and Relevancy (Thomas F. Guernsey), 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

When a Child's Best Interests Are At Issue: Privacy of Mental Health Records In Divorce and Custody Proceedings, 49 Tenn. B.J. 21 (2013).

Attorney General Opinions. Obtaining a parent’s mental-health information in child-custody cases. OAG 14-55, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 57 (5/14/14)

24-1-208. Persons gathering information for publication or broadcast — Disclosure.

A person engaged in gathering information for publication or broadcast connected with or employed by the news media or press, or who is independently engaged in gathering information for publication or broadcast, shall not be required by a court, a grand jury, the general assembly, or any administrative body, to disclose before the general assembly or any Tennessee court, grand jury, agency, department, or commission any information or the source of any information procured for publication or broadcast.

Subsection (a) shall not apply with respect to the source of any allegedly defamatory information in any case where the defendant in a civil action for defamation asserts a defense based on the source of such information.

Any person seeking information or the source thereof protected under this section may apply for an order divesting such protection. Such application shall be made to the judge of the court having jurisdiction over the hearing, action or other proceeding in which the information sought is pending.

The application shall be granted only if the court after hearing the parties determines that the person seeking the information has shown by clear and convincing evidence that:

There is probable cause to believe that the person from whom the information is sought has information which is clearly relevant to a specific probable violation of law;

The person has demonstrated that the information sought cannot reasonably be obtained by alternative means; and

The person has demonstrated a compelling and overriding public interest of the people of the state of Tennessee in the information.

Any order of the trial court may be appealed to the court of appeals in the same manner as other civil cases. The court of appeals shall make an independent determination of the applicability of the standards in this subsection (c) to the facts in the record and shall not accord a presumption of correctness to the trial court's findings.

The execution of or any proceeding to enforce a judgment divesting the protection of this section shall be stayed pending appeal upon the timely filing of a notice of appeal in accordance with Rule 3 of the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, and the appeal shall be expedited upon the docket of the court of appeals upon the application of either party.

Any order of the court of appeals may be appealed to the supreme court of Tennessee as provided by law.

Acts 1973, ch. 27, §§ 1-3; T.C.A, § 24-113—24-115; Acts 1988, ch. 803, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, §§ 20; 20 Tenn. Juris., Newspapers, § 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 54.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Grants Newsmen a Qualified Disclosure Shield, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 143.

Tennessee's Newsman Shield Law — Confidentiality Not a Requirement, 14 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 418 (1984).

Toward a Unified Approach to Privileges and Relevancy (Thomas F. Guernsey), 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

“We Have a Warrant to Search Your Files!” (Charles Currier), 19 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. The divestiture order provisions of T.C.A. §24-1-208(c)(1) apply only when someone is seeking disclosure of information or the source of information that is protected under Tenn. Code Ann. §24-1-208(a). The divestiture order provisions of Tenn. Code Ann. § 24-1208(c)(1) do not apply with reference to T.C.A. §24-1-208(b). OAG 16-23, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (6/21/2016).

24-1-209. Communication between attorney and private detective privileged.

Communication between an attorney and a private detective or investigator hired by such attorney, while acting in their respective professional capacities shall be privileged communications.

Acts 1973, ch. 339, § 1; T.C.A., § 24-116.

Cross-References. Evidentiary privileges inapplicable in child sexual abuse cases, §37-1-614.

Private investigators, licensing and regulation, title 62, ch. 26, part 2.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Law Reviews.

Toward a Unified Approach to Privileges and Relevancy (Thomas F. Guernsey), 17 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

24-1-210. Interpreters — Dual party relay operators.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Dual party relay operator” means a person who facilitates communication over the telephone between persons, one (1) of whom depends on the use of a special device for transmitting text rather than the spoken voice through the telephone line; and

“Interpreter” means a person who facilitates communication between persons who are unable to communicate with one another directly without such facilitation.

No interpreter or dual party relay operator shall be permitted or required to disclose information obtained by virtue of facilitating any confidential communication.

No interpreter or dual party relay operator shall be discharged or discriminated against for complying with the provisions of subsection (b).

Acts 1990, ch. 810, § 1.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

24-1-211. Deaf persons — Providing oral or deaf sign language interpreters in administrative and judicial proceedings.

As used in this section:

“Deaf person” means a person with a hearing loss so great as to prevent such person from understanding language spoken in a normal tone. “Deaf person” further includes, but is not limited to, a person who is mute and a person who is both deaf and mute. The archaic term “dumb” that formerly related to deaf people shall hereafter be struck from all future state publications that in any way refer to the deaf;

“Oral interpreter” means a person who interprets language through facial and lip movements only and who does not use manual communication. An oral interpreter shall be provided upon the request of a deaf person who does not communicate in sign language. The right of a deaf person to an interpreter may not be waived except by a deaf person who does not use sign language and who initiates such request for waiver in writing. Such waiver is subject to approval of counsel to such deaf person, if existent, and is subject to approval of the appointing authority; and

“Qualified interpreter” means an interpreter certified by the National Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, Tennessee Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, or, in the event an interpreter so certified is not available, an interpreter whose qualifications are otherwise determined. Efforts to obtain the services of a qualified interpreter certified with a Legal Skills Certificate or a Comprehensive Skills Certificate will be made prior to accepting services of an interpreter with lesser certification. No “qualified interpreter” shall be appointed unless the appointing authority and the deaf person make a preliminary determination that the interpreter is able to readily communicate with the deaf person and is able to accurately interpret the statements of the deaf person and interpret the proceedings in which a deaf person may be involved.

In any case in law or equity before any court or the grand jury, wherein any deaf person is a party to such action, either as a complainant, defendant, or witness, the court shall appoint a qualified interpreter of the deaf sign language to interpret the proceedings to the deaf person and interpret the person's testimony or statements and to assist in preparation with counsel.

In any proceeding before any department, board, commission, agency, or licensing authority of the state, or any political subdivision or municipality, wherein any deaf person is a principal party of interest, either as a complainant, defendant, witness or supplicant, any department, board, commission, agency, or licensing authority of the state or any political subdivision or municipality wherein such shall appoint a qualified interpreter to interpret the proceedings to the deaf person and to interpret the person's testimony or statements.

In the event a person who is deaf is arrested and taken into custody for any alleged violation of a criminal law of this state, the arresting officers' and the arresting officers' superiors shall procure a qualified interpreter in order to properly interrogate such deaf person and to interpret such person's statements. No statement taken from such deaf person before an interpreter is present may be admissible in court.

Every deaf person whose appearance before a proceeding entitles such person to an interpreter should notify the appointing authority of such need prior to any appearance and should request at such time the services of an interpreter; provided, that where a deaf person reasonably expects the need for an interpreter to be for a period greater than a single day, such person should notify the appointing authority and such notification shall be sufficient for the duration of the person's participation in the proceedings.

An appointing authority may require a person requesting the appointment of an interpreter to furnish reasonable proof of deafness when the appointing authority has reason to believe that the person is not deaf.

It shall be the responsibility of the appointing authority to channel requests for qualified interpreters through:

Local interpreter/referral centers for the deaf;

The Tennessee Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf;

The Tennessee council for the deaf and hard of hearing; or, in the alternative,

The department of human services, division of vocational rehabilitation.

It is the responsibility of the Tennessee Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf to compile and update annually a listing of qualified interpreters and to make this listing available to authorities in possible need of interpreter service as provided in this section.

Before a qualified interpreter will participate in any proceedings subsequent to an appointment under this section, such interpreter shall make an oath or affirmation that such interpreter will make a true interpretation in an understandable manner to the deaf person for whom the interpreter is appointed and that such interpreter will interpret the statements of the deaf person desiring that statements be made, in the English language to the best of such interpreter's skill and judgment. The appointing authority shall provide recess periods as necessary for the interpreter when the interpreter so indicates. Any and all information that the interpreter gathers from the deaf person pertaining to any proceeding then pending shall at all times remain confidential and privileged, or on an equal basis with the attorney-client privilege, unless such deaf person desires that such information be communicated to other persons.

An interpreter appointed under this section shall be entitled to a reasonable fee for such services. The fee shall be in accordance with standards established by the Tennessee Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, in addition to actual expenses for travel and transportation. When the interpreter is appointed by a court, the fee shall be paid out of general county funds and when the interpreter is otherwise appointed the fee shall be paid out of funds available to the appointing authority.

Acts 1957, ch. 233, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 123, § 1; T.C.A., § 24-108; Acts 1981, ch. 66, § 1; T.C.A., §24-1-103; Acts 2001, ch. 174, § 3.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 41 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rules 501 and 604 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-43.06-1.

Law Reviews.

Competency and Impeachment of Witnesses (Leo Bearman, Jr.), 57 Tenn. L. Rev. 89 (1989).

Confrontation and the Law of Evidence: Can the Language Conduit Theory Survive in the Wake of Crawford? 67 Vand. L. Rev. 1497 (2014).

Should Tennessee Bury the Dead Man Statute As Arkansas Has? (W. Dent Gitchel), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 195 (1989).

24-1-206. Clergy — Communications confidential — Waiver — Misdemeanor offense.